Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Chapter 47. Mississippi Vulnerable Persons Act
§ 43-47-21.
Payment for services; orders to provide custody, care, and maintenance.

At the time the department makes an evaluation of the case reported, in accordance with the provisions of Section 43-47-9, it shall be determined, according to the regulations set by the department, whether the vulnerable person is financially capable of paying for the essential services. If he is, he shall make reimbursement for the costs of providing the needed essential services. If it is determined that he is not financially capable of paying for such services, they shall be provided at no cost to the recipient of the services. The court may order the department or any public agency to provide for the custody, care and maintenance of such vulnerable person. Provided, however, that the care, custody and maintenance of any vulnerable person shall be within statutory authorization and budgetary means of such institution, facility, agency or department. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, it is not the intent of the Legislature through the adoption of this chapter to authorize any court exercising jurisdiction over a vulnerable person to enlarge or bring about the addition of new groups or categories of recipients or to increase the types of care and services for such persons under the Mississippi Medicaid Law, and any court exercising jurisdiction over a vulnerable person shall not, in any way, enter an order against the Division of Medicaid to provide for the custody, care, or maintenance of a vulnerable person who is not otherwise eligible for medical assistance under Section 43-13-115 or services under Section 43-13-117.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 468, § 11; reenacted, Laws, 1989, ch. 381, § 11; Laws, 2010, ch. 357, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 43-47-23.
Authority to seek cooperation of organizations and agencies.

The department and the court are authorized to seek the cooperation of all public agencies, departments, societies, organizations or agencies having for their object the protection or aid of vulnerable persons. These agencies, departments, societies and organizations shall provide any such assistance as is necessary.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 468, § 12; reenacted, Laws, 1989, ch. 381, § 12; Laws, 2001, ch. 603, § 5; Laws, 2010, ch. 357, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 43-47-25.
Immunity of department employees from liability.

Any officer, agent or employee of the department in the good faith exercise of his duties under this chapter shall not be liable for any civil damages as a result of his acts or omissions in rendering assistance or aid to any vulnerable person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 468, § 13; reenacted, Laws, 1989, ch. 381, § 13; Laws, 2010, ch. 357, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 43-47-27.
Adoption of standards, procedures, and guidelines.

The department shall adopt standards and other procedures and guidelines with forms to insure the effective implementation of the provisions of this chapter no later than October 1, 2001.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 468, § 14; reenacted, Laws, 1989, ch. 381, § 14; Laws, 2001, ch. 603, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 43-47-29.
Appointment of conservator pursuant to Section 93-20-401 or 93-20-402.

[Effective from and after January 1, 2020, this section will read as follows:]

In addition to the powers granted under the provisions of this chapter, the department is authorized to petition the court under the provisions of Section 93-20-401 or 93-20-402 for appointment of a conservator for any vulnerable person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 468, § 15; reenacted, Laws, 1989, ch. 381, § 15; Laws, 2010, ch. 357, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2010; Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2020.; Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 43-47-31.
Objection to provision of services on privacy grounds; persons receiving treatment by spiritual means; objection to medical treatment.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize, permit or require any emergency or protective services in contravention of the stated or implied objection of such person based upon his right of privacy, which is grounded in the federal courts and the courts of this state, except in a situation where the vulnerable person is in imminent danger of serious harm.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to mean a person is neglected or in need of emergency or protective services for the sole reason he is being furnished or relies upon treatment by spiritual means through prayer alone in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denominations.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize, permit or require any medical care or treatment in contravention of the stated or implied objection of such person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 468, § 16; reenacted, Laws, 1989, ch. 381, § 16; Laws, 2001, ch. 603, § 7; Laws, 2010, ch. 357, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 43-47-33.
Education program.

The department shall establish a comprehensive, aggressive program to educate the general public of (a) the existence and provisions of the Mississippi Vulnerable Persons Act of 1986; (b) the duty to report the abuse, neglect or exploitation of any and all vulnerable persons, and (c) criminal sanctions associated with violations of the Mississippi Vulnerable Persons Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 468, § 17; reenacted, Laws, 1989, ch. 381, § 17; Laws, 2001, ch. 603, § 8; Laws, 2010, ch. 357, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 43-47-35.
Implementation of chapter if federal funds become available.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the department shall implement the provisions of this chapter in the event federal funding is made available therefor under a social services block grant, or in the event any other federal or state funding is made available to provide for protective services for vulnerable persons.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 468, § 18; reenacted, Laws, 1989, ch. 381, § 18; Laws, 2001, ch. 603, § 9; Laws, 2010, ch. 357, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 43-47-37.
Reporting of abuse and exploitation of patients and residents of care facilities.

Any person who, within the scope of his employment at a care facility as defined in Section 43-47-5(b), or in his professional or personal capacity, has knowledge of or reasonable cause to believe that any patient or resident of a care facility has been the victim of abuse, neglect or exploitation shall report immediately the abuse, neglect or exploitation.

The reporting of conduct as required by subsection (1) of this section shall be made:

By any employee of any home health agency, orally or telephonically, within twenty-four (24) hours of discovery, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, to the department and the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit of the Attorney General’s office.

By a home health agency, in writing within seventy-two (72) hours of discovery to the department and the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit. Upon initial review, the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit shall make a determination whether or not the person suspected of committing the reported abuse, neglect or exploitation was an employee of the home health agency. If so, the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit shall determine whether there is substantial potential for criminal prosecution, and upon a positive determination, shall investigate and prosecute the complaint or refer it to an appropriate criminal investigative or prosecutive authority. If the alleged perpetrator is not an employee of the home health agency, the department shall investigate and process the complaint or refer it to an appropriate investigative or prosecutive authority.

By all other care facilities, orally or telephonically, within twenty-four (24) hours of discovery, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, to the State Department of Health and the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit of the Attorney General’s office.

By all other care facilities, in writing, within seventy-two (72) hours of the discovery, to the State Department of Health and the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit. If, upon initial review by the State Department of Health and the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit, a determination is made that there is substantial potential for criminal prosecution, the unit will investigate and prosecute the complaint or refer it to an appropriate criminal investigative or prosecutive authority.

The contents of the reports required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall contain the following information unless the information is unobtainable by the person reporting:

The name, address, telephone number, occupation and employer’s address and telephone number of the person reporting;

The name and address of the patient or resident who is believed to be the victim of abuse or exploitation;

The details, observations and beliefs concerning the incident;

Any statements relating to the incident made by the patient or resident;

The date, time and place of the incident;

The name of any individual(s) believed to have knowledge of the incident;

The name of the individual(s) believed to be responsible for the incident and their connection to the patient or resident; and

Such other information that may be required by the State Department of Health and/or the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit, as requested.

Except as otherwise provided by Section 43-7-65 for the State Ombudsman Program, any other individual who has knowledge of or reasonable cause to believe that any patient or resident of a care facility has been the victim of abuse, exploitation or any other criminal offense may make a report to the State Department of Health and the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit.

Any individual who, in good faith, makes a report as provided in this section or who testifies in an official proceeding regarding matters arising out of this section shall be immune from all criminal and civil liability. The immunity granted under this subsection shall not apply to any suspect or perpetrator of abuse, neglect or exploitation of any vulnerable person, or of any other criminal act under any statute of this state or municipal ordinance defining any act as a crime or misdemeanor.

No person shall terminate from employment, demote, reject for promotion or otherwise sanction, punish or retaliate against any individual who, in good faith, makes a report as provided in this section or who testifies in any official proceeding regarding matters arising out of this section.

Any care facility that complies in good faith with the requirements of this section to report the abuse or exploitation of a patient or resident in the care facility shall not be sanctioned by the State Department of Health for the occurrence of such abuse or exploitation if the care facility demonstrates that it adequately trained its employees and that the abuse or exploitation was caused by factors beyond the control of the care facility.

Every person who knowingly fails to make the report as required by subsections (1), (2) and (3) of this section or attempts to induce another, by threat or otherwise, to fail to make a report as required by subsections (1), (2) and (3) of this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

Copies of Sections 43-47-7 and 43-47-37 shall be posted prominently in every health care facility.

If, after initial inquiry or investigation, the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit determines that there is reasonable cause to believe that an employee of a home health agency has abused, neglected or exploited a vulnerable person, the unit shall notify the Mississippi State Department of Health of the alleged abuse, neglect or exploitation.

Upon a judicial determination of evidence that an employee of a care facility has abused, neglected or exploited a vulnerable person, the appropriate investigative agency shall immediately provide the following information to the central registry: name, address, birth date, social security number of the perpetrator; type of abuse, neglect and/or exploitation; name, address, birth date, social security number of the victim; and date of the incident and report.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 493, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 431 § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 351, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 603, § 10; Laws, 2010, ch. 357, § 19; Laws, 2017, ch. 344, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 43-47-39.
Vulnerable Persons Training, Investigation and Prosecution Fund created; purpose; funding; funding of expenses of Vulnerable Persons Unit; deposit of user charges and fees authorized under this section into State General Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Vulnerable Persons Training, Investigation and Prosecution Fund. The purpose of the fund shall be to provide funding for the Vulnerable Persons Unit in the Office of the Attorney General to assist in the training of law enforcement officers, judges, district attorneys, state agencies and investigators at the Department of Human Services with regard to issues arising under the Vulnerable Persons Act, and to provide funding for the Vulnerable Persons Unit in the Office of the Attorney General to assist in the investigation and prosecution of statewide offenders who abuse, neglect or exploit vulnerable persons. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal-year limitations.

Funding shall be provided by assessments collected from violations set out in Section 99-19-73.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of the Vulnerable Persons Unit shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law and as determined by the State Fiscal Officer.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 357, § 20; Laws, 1st Ex Sess, 2017, ch. 7, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017).